Montana, session 2025, HB559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Identifying stretches of river for commercial fishing, guiding, and
outfitting-free days. (1) For 2 days of each week between the third Saturday of May and Labor Day of each
calendar year, the department shall identify river stretches where commercial fishing, guiding, or outfitting is not
allowed. Commercial fishing, guiding, and outfitting-free river stretches must be identified for the following
rivers:
(a) the Bitterroot River, from the Wally Crawford fishing access site to its confluence with the Clark
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 559

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 559.1
Fork of the Columbia River;
(b) the Clark Fork of the Columbia River, west of the Reserve street bridge in Missoula;
(c) the Clark Fork of the Columbia River, east of the Reserve street bridge in Missoula;
(d) the Big Blackfoot River;
(e) the Madison River, above Ennis Lake;
(f) the upper Yellowstone River, downstream of the Gardiner bridge to the Sheep Mountain fishing
access site;
(g) the North Fork of the Flathead River; and
(h) the Middle Fork of the Flathead River.
(2) The department shall develop recommendations for which days of the week the identified
stretches of river will be commercial fishing, guiding, and outfitting-free, except that one day must be Saturday.
(3) The identified stretches of rivers must be of a length or float time to provide for an average day
of recreational use.
(4) The identification process administered by the department pursuant to this section must include
procedures for public notice and opportunity for comment, collaborative processes, or public hearing, as
appropriate.
(5) The department shall identify commercial fishing, guiding, and outfitting-free stretches for each
river in subsection (1) by no later than October 1, 2027, and make recommendations to the commission. The
department may make these recommendations sequentially or as one comprehensive recommendation. The
commission shall adopt, modify, or reject the recommendation for each stretch of river within 6 months of
receipt from the department.
(7) The department shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section by May 15, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 87, chapter 3, part 1, and the provisions of Title 87, chapter 3, part 1, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 559